Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8717
Reportable patient safety events; provider; duties.

(1) Every provider subject to the Patient Safety Improvement Act shall track and report pursuant to section 71-8718 the following occurrences of patient safety events:

(a) Surgery or procedures performed on the wrong patient or the wrong body part of a patient;

(b) Foreign object accidentally left in a patient during a procedure or surgery;

(c) Hemolytic transfusion reaction in a patient resulting from the administration of blood or blood products with major blood group incompatibilities;

(d) Sexual assault of a patient during treatment or while the patient was on the premises of a facility;

(e) Abduction of a newborn infant patient from the hospital or the discharge of a newborn infant patient from the hospital into the custody of an individual in circumstances in which the hospital knew, or in the exercise of ordinary care should have known, that the individual did not have legal custody of the infant;

(f) Suicide of a patient in a setting in which the patient received care twenty-four hours a day;

(g) Medication error resulting in a patient's unanticipated death or permanent or temporary loss of bodily function, including (i) treatment intervention, temporary harm, (ii) initial-prolonged hospitalization, temporary harm, (iii) permanent patient harm, and (iv) near death event in circumstances unrelated to the natural course of the illness or underlying condition of the patient, including, but not limited to, errors involving the wrong drug, the wrong dose, the wrong patient, the wrong time, the wrong rate, the wrong preparation, or the wrong route of administration, but excluding reasonable differences in clinical judgment on drug selection and dose;

(h) Patient death or serious disability associated with the use of adulterated drugs, devices, or biologics provided by the provider;

(i) Patient death or serious disability associated with the use or function of a device in patient care in which the device is used or functions other than as intended; and

(j) Unanticipated death or major permanent loss of function associated with health care associated nosocomial infection.

(2) A patient safety organization, based on a review of new indicators of patient safety events identified by the Joint Commission on Accreditation of Healthcare Organizations, shall recommend changes, additions, or deletions to the list of reportable patient safety events, which changes, additions, or deletions shall be binding on the providers. Providers may voluntarily report any other patient safety events not otherwise identified.

Laws 2005, LB 361, § 17.